Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-638
Birth or death certificates; application for amendment; made one year after date; evidence required.

Applications for amendments to vital records made one year or more after the event, unless otherwise provided in the regulations or by law, shall be supported by (1) an affidavit setting forth information to identify the certificate, the incorrect data as it is listed on the certificate, and the correct data as it should appear; and (2) two or more items of documentary evidence which support the alleged facts and which were established at least five years prior to the date of application for amendment or within seven years of the date of the event.

Laws 1971, LB 245, § 5.